Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.010

Authority to invest—Limits on loans and extensions of credit.

(1) An association may invest its funds only as provided in this chapter.

(2) An association is subject to the same limits on loans and extensions of credit, and exceptions thereto, as set forth in *RCW 30.04.111.

[ 2013 c 76 s 30; 1994 c 92 s 445; 1982 c 3 s 45; 1979 c 113 s 6; 1963 c 246 s 7; 1953 c 71 s 6; 1947 c 257 s 5; 1945 c 235 s 58; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3717-177. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 11; 1933 c 183 ss 39, 52, 56, 58; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 5; 1913 c 110 ss 8, 9; 1903 c 116 s 2; 1890 p 56 ss 4, 30.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.04.111 was recodified as RCW 30A.04.111 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1979 c 113: See note following RCW 33.04.020.